csv2yaml/yaml_output/VTI_aa.yaml
     ayaan+VTI+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Imp+NA+Del+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Imp+NA+Del+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+0Sg: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+0Sg: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: ayaaman
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: ayaang
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: ayaamaang
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: ayaangwaa
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: ayaaminid
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: ayaamowaad
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: ayaamang
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: ayaameg
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: ayaanziwaan
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: ayaanziweg
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: ayaanziwan
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: ayaanzigwaa
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: ayaanzinig
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: ayaanzig
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: ayaanziwaang
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: ayaanziwang
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+X+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+X+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Pl: nidayaanan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidayaan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+0Pl: gidayaanaawaan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+0Sg: gidayaanaawaa
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0Pl: gidayaanan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0Sg: gidayaan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+0Pl: odayaanaawaan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+0Sg: odayaanaawaa
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+0Pl: odayaanan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+0Sg: odayaan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+0Pl: nidayaamin
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+0Sg: nidayaamin
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+0Pl: gidayaamin
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+0Sg: gidayaamin
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+0Sg: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+0Pl: nidayaasiinan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidayaasiin
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+0Pl: gidayaasiinaawaan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+0Sg: gidayaasiinaawaa
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+0Pl: gidayaasiinan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+0Sg: gidayaasiin
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+0Pl: odayaasiinaawaan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+0Sg: odayaasiinaawaa
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+0Pl: odayaasiinan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+0Sg: odayaasiin
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+0Pl: nidayaasiimin
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+0Sg: nidayaasiimin
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+0Pl: gidayaasiimin
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+0Sg: gidayaasiimin
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+0Sg: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+0Pl: [nidayaanaabaniin,nidayaanaabanen]
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+0Sg: nidayaanaaban
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+0Pl: [gidayaanaawaabaniin,gidayaanaawaabanen]
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+0Sg: gidayaanaawaaban
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+0Pl: [gidayaanaabaniin,gidayaanaabanen]
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+0Sg: gidayaanaaban
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+0Pl: [odayaanaawaabaniin,odayaanaawaabanen]
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+0Sg: odayaanaawaaban
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Pl: [odayaaninaabaniin,odayaaninaabanen]
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg: odayaaninaaban
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+0Pl: [odayaanaabaniin,odayaanaabanen]
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+0Sg: odayaanaaban
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+0Pl: [nidayaaminaabaniin,nidayaaminaabanen]
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+0Sg: nidayaaminaaban
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+0Pl: [gidayaaminaabaniin,gidayaaminaabanen]
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+0Sg: gidayaaminaaban
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+0Sg: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+0Pl: [nidayaasiinaabaniin,nidayaasiinaabanen]
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+0Sg: nidayaasiinaaban
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+0Pl: [gidayaasiinaawaabaniin,gidayaasiinaawaabanen]
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+0Sg: gidayaasiinaawaaban
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+0Pl: [gidayaasiinaabaniin,gidayaasiinaabanen]
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+0Sg: gidayaasiinaaban
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+0Pl: [odayaasiinaawaabaniin,odayaasiinaawaabanen]
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+0Sg: odayaasiinaawaaban
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Pl: [odayaasiininaabaniin,odayaasiininaabanen]
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg: odayaasiininaaban
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+0Pl: [odayaasiinaabaniin,odayaasiinaabanen]
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+0Sg: odayaasiinaaban
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+0Pl: [nidayaasiiminaabaniin,nidayaasiiminaabanen]
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+0Sg: nidayaasiiminaaban
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+0Pl: [gidayaasiiminaabaniin,gidayaasiiminaabanen]
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+0Sg: gidayaasiiminaaban
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+0Sg: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+0Pl: nidayaanaadogenan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+0Sg: nidayaanaadog
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+0Pl: gidayaanaawaadogenan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+0Sg: gidayaanaawaadog
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+0Pl: gidayaanaadogenan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+0Sg: gidayaanaadog
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+0Pl: odayaanaawaadogenan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+0Sg: odayaanaawaadog
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Pl: odayaaninaadogenan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg: odayaaninaadog
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+0Pl: odayaanaadogenan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+0Sg: odayaanaadog
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+0Pl: nidayaaminaadogenan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+0Sg: nidayaaminaadog
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+0Pl: gidayaaminaadogenan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+0Sg: gidayaaminaadog
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+0Sg: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+0Pl: nidayaasiinaadogenan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+0Sg: nidayaasiinaadog
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+0Pl: gidayaasiinaawaadogenan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+0Sg: gidayaasiinaawaadog
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+0Pl: gidayaasiinaadogenan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+0Sg: gidayaasiinaadog
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+0Pl: odayaasiinaawaadogenan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+0Sg: odayaasiinaawaadog
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Pl: odayaasiininaadogenan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg: odayaasiininaadog
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+0Pl: odayaasiinaadogenan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+0Sg: odayaasiinaadog
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+0Pl: nidayaasiiminaadogenan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+0Sg: nidayaasiiminaadog
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+0Pl: gidayaasiiminaadogenan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+0Sg: gidayaasiiminaadog
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+0Sg: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+0Sg: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+2Pl+0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+2Pl+0Sg: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+2Sg+0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+2Sg+0Sg: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProx+0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProx+0Sg: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProx+0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProx+0Sg: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+Excl+0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+Excl+0Sg: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+Incl+0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+Incl+0Sg: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+X+0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+DubPrt+X+0Sg: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+0Sg: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+2Pl+0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+2Pl+0Sg: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+2Sg+0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+2Sg+0Sg: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProx+0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProx+0Sg: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProx+0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProx+0Sg: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+Excl+0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+Excl+0Sg: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+Incl+0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+DubPrt+Incl+0Sg: MISSING
